output/hyph-id-orthos-js.pat
.ter1
a1a
a1e
a1g
a1i
al1an
am1an
an1an
a1ngak
a1ngas
a1ngau
a1ngi
a1o
ap1an
a1r
ar1an
a1u
a1y
1b
ber1
b1n
b1r
b1y
1c
cak1an
1d
d1n
d1r
e1a
e1e
e1g
e1i
ek1an.
e1o
etak1
e1u
e1y
1f
g1g
g1n
1h
h1an
h1g
hiper1
h1n
h1r
h1y
i1
if1an
im1an.
1inf
ir1an
1j
1k
k1g
k1n
k1r
k1y
1l
l1ajar
l1an.
l1g
l1ism
l1n
l1r
l1y
1m
m1n
mper1
m1r
1na
n1an.
1ne
ng1
1nga.
1ngah
1ngai
1ngap
1ngar
1ngat
1nge
1ngia
1ngila
1ngit
1ngo
1ngu
1ni
1no
n1r
1nu
1ny
o1
ok1an
olak1
ol1an
1orga
1p
p1g
p1n
1q
1ra
r1an.
1re
r1g
1ri
r1n
1ro
1ru
r1y
1s
s1an
se1nga
s1g
s1n
s1r
1t
t1an
t1g
t1n
u1
uh1
uk1an.
um1an.
un1an
up1an
ur1an
1v
1w
1z
